Maryland, session 2026, HB1646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1646*

HOUSE BILL 1646
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Aviation Administration.
5–415.1.
WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR AND THE SECRETARY, THE
ADMINISTRATION MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE FEDERAL TRANSPORTATION SECURITY
ADMINISTRATION’S SCREENING PARTNERSHIP PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.